Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-902
Members; vacancy in office; filled by Governor.

Upon the death, resignation, failure, or refusal to serve of any appointed commissioner, his office shall become vacant; and the Governor shall make an appointment to fill the vacancy, such appointment to be for the unexpired term of the former appointee.

Laws 1951, c. 166, § 2, p. 649.